Washington statutes.
RCW 7.56.030

Contents of information.

The information shall consist of a plain statement of the facts which constitute the grounds of the proceedings, addressed to the court.

[Code 1881 s 704; 1877 p 143 s 708; 1854 p 216 s 470; RRS s 1036.]